District of Columbia statutes.
38-2023.15

Waiver of annuity; revocation.

Any person entitled to annuity pursuant to the provisions of subchapter I of this chapter or part A of this subchapter may decline to accept all or any part of such annuity by a waiver signed and filed with the District of Columbia Retirement Board. Such waiver may be revoked in writing at any time, but no payment of the annuity waived shall be made covering the period during which such waiver was in effect.

July 2, 1956, 70 Stat. 487, ch. 497, § 2
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 57, 52 DCR 2638
1981 Ed., § 31-1246.
1973 Ed., § 31-740.
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “District of Columbia Retirement Board” for “Mayor of the District of Columbia or his designated agent”.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.